guesser/guess_bezhta_noun.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun Quotative? (Question | ConjClitics | PartClitics)?

PATTERN Noun
#множественное число
NounRoot[а] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[а] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[аь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[аь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[ба] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ба] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[баь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[баь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[ва] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ва] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[ваь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ваь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[да] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[да] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[даь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[даь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[йа] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[йа] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[йаь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[йаь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[ла] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ла] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[лаь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[лаь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[бо] [<n>:] DeclType[n] (NounPl[бо] [<abs>:]) | (Noun-Pl-Obl[ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[боь] [<n>:] DeclType[n](NounPl[боь] [<abs>:]) | (Noun-Pl-Obl[лаь] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[рол] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[рол] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[ро] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ро] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,h] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRoot[роь] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[роь] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[-ла,-лаь,s] Infl | LocativeInflection)
NounRootLong[ā] [<n>:] DeclType[n] NounPl[ā] [<abs>:] | (Noun-Pl-Obl[no] Infl | LocativeInflection)

#склонение по падежам
NounRoot-Obl DeclType[n] Infl | LocativeInflection
SuppletiveRoot [<n>:] DeclType[n] Infl | LocativeInflection

LEXICON NounPl
<pl>:>а{UM}[а] # аа -> ā held by variants.hfst 
<pl>:>аь[аь]
<pl>:>ба{UM}[ба]
<pl>:>баь[баь]
<pl>:>ва{UM}[ва]
<pl>:>ваь[ваь]
<pl>:>да{UM}[да]
<pl>:>да[даь]
<pl>:>йа{UM}[йа]
<pl>:>йа[йаь]
<pl>:>ла{UM}[ла]
<pl>:>лаь[лаь]
<pl>:>бо{UM}[бо]
<pl>:>боь[боь]
<pl>:>ро{UM}л[рол]
<pl>:>ро{UM}[ро]
<pl>:>роь[роь]
<pl>:>ā{UM}[ā]

LEXICON Noun-Pl-Obl
<obl>:>а[а,h]
<obl>:>аь[аь,s]
<obl>:>ла[ла,h]
<obl>:>лаь[лаь,s]
<obl>:[no,h,s]
